Louisiana, session 2026, HB205.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 18:426.1(B) is hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 18:426.1(C)
is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§426.1. Election commissioners; compensation
* * *
B. The compensation provided for in Subsection A of this Section shall serve
as compensation for time worked on election day and for participation in any courses
of instruction provided for in this Part.
B. C.(1) For an election held within one year following the date of the
issuance of any gubernatorial declaration of an emergency, upon application of a
parish board of election supervisors, the secretary of state may approve payment of
up to one hundred dollars per election or each day of assistance, if applicable, as
compensation to each commissioner in addition to compensation provided for in
Subsection A of this Section.
(2) The secretary of state may pay each commissioner as provided in
Paragraphs (A)(1), (2), and (4) of this Section a supplemental payment of one
hundred dollars per election day or each day of assistance, if applicable, in addition
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 205 ENROLLED
to the compensation provided in Subsection A of this Section, subject to
appropriation of funds.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2027.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.